Idaho statutes. Title 25 ANIMALS
Chapter 1 CONTROL OF SHEEP DISEASES
§ 25-156. Report.

On or before January 15 of each year, the board, or entity the board has contracted with pursuant to the provisions of section 25-155, Idaho Code, shall file with the senate agricultural affairs committee, the house agricultural affairs committee, the legislative council, the state controller, and the division of financial management, a report showing the annual income to the board during the preceding fiscal year. The report shall also include an estimate of income to the board for the current fiscal year and a projection of anticipated expenses by category for the current fiscal year. The report shall also include a reconciliation between the estimated income and expenses projected and the actual income and expenses of the preceding fiscal year.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-156, as added by 1998, ch. 205, § 4, p. 726; am. 2003, ch. 32, § 15, p. 115; am. 2012, ch. 117, § 18, p. 321.

§ 25-157. Bonds of agents and employees. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2012, ch. 117, § 19, effective July 1, 2012.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-157, as added by 1998, ch. 205, § 4, p. 726.

§ 25-158. State not liable for acts or omissions of board or of its employees.

The state of Idaho is not liable for the acts or omissions of the board or any member thereof or any officer, agent or employee thereof.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-158, as added by 1998, ch. 205, § 4, p. 726; am. 2012, ch. 117, § 20, p. 321.

§ 25-159. Assessment.

In addition to the assessment described in section 25-131, Idaho Code, there is hereby levied upon all wool grown annually in the state of Idaho an assessment of up to four cents (4¢) per pound of wool marketed. The assessment shall be collected in the amount authorized by the Idaho wool growers association and in the same manner as prescribed in this chapter with all provisions of this chapter, and corresponding rules, applying thereto.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-159, as added by 1998, ch. 205, § 4, p. 726.

§ 25-160. Referendum for wool growers.

Prior to the provisions of this act becoming effective, a referendum shall be held to determine if producers favor the provisions of this act. The question shall be submitted by secret ballot upon which the words “Do you favor a promotion, research, and education program for the Idaho sheep industry that is funded by all producers with no refund provision?” are printed with a square before each of the words “YES” and “NO” with directions to insert an “X” mark in the square before the proposition which the voter favors. If a majority of the producers voting in the referendum or a majority of the production represented by the producers voting in the referendum vote in favor of the question submitted, the provisions of this act shall become effective.

The procedures necessary to initiate a referendum in subsequent years, but not less than five (5) years from the passage of the initial referendum, are as follows:

A referendum shall be held if the Idaho department of agriculture receives a petition requesting such referendum signed by ten percent (10%) or more of sheep producers who have paid an assessment to the Idaho sheep and goat health board in either of the two (2) immediate past calendar years; or

A referendum shall be held if the Idaho department of agriculture receives a written request for such referendum from the Idaho sheep and goat health board.

Any referendum shall be conducted only among sheep producers who paid an assessment to the Idaho sheep and goat health board during one (1) of the two (2) years prior to the referendum.
(2)(a) Any referendum shall be conducted only among sheep producers who paid an assessment to the Idaho sheep and goat health board during one (1) of the two (2) years prior to the referendum.

Any referendum must be supervised by the Idaho department of agriculture.

Any referendum shall be held, and the result determined and declared by the director of the department of agriculture, and recorded in the office of the secretary of state.

Notice of any referendum must be given by the board in a manner determined by it. The ballots must be prepared by the board and forwarded to eligible producers, who shall return them within twenty (20) days after mailing by the board.

The board shall pay the costs of any referendum.

History.

I.C.,§ 25-160, as added by 1998, ch. 205, § 4, p. 726; am. 2012, ch. 117, § 21, p. 321.